Illinois, session 104th, HB3554.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Section 4.36 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/4.36)7    Sec. 4.36. Acts repealed on January 1, 2026. The following 8Acts are repealed on January 1, 2026: 9    The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and 10Nail Technology Act of 1985.11    The Collection Agency Act.12    The Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act.13    The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act.14    The Illinois Dental Practice Act. 15    The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act.16    The Illinois Physical Therapy Act.17    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act.18    The Respiratory Care Practice Act.19(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15; 99-204, eff. 7-30-15; 2099-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-229, eff. 8-3-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 2199-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-492, eff. 2212-31-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.)   HB3554- 2 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    Section 10. The Collection Agency Act is amended by 2changing Sections 2, 2.03, 2.04, 4, 4.5, 9, 9.1, 11, 13.2, 14b, 316, 17, 18, 19, 20, 22, 23, and 35 as follows: 4    (205 ILCS 740/2)  (was 225 ILCS 425/2)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 2. Definitions. In this Act: 7    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 8by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 9file or license file as maintained by the Department 10Department's licensure maintenance unit.11    "Board" means the Collection Agency Licensing and 12Disciplinary Board. 13    "Charge-off balance" means an account principal and other 14legally collectible costs, expenses, and interest accrued 15prior to the charge-off date, less any payments or settlement. 16    "Charge-off date" means the date on which a receivable is 17treated as a loss or expense. 18    "Collection agency" means any person who: , in the 19ordinary course of business, regularly, (1) engages in the 20business of collection of any debt for others; (2) engages in 21the business of receiving, by assignment or otherwise, debt 22from any person who owns or controls 20% or more of the 23business receiving the assignment with the purpose of 24collecting moneys due on such debt; (3) sells or attempts to 25sell, or gives away or attempts to give away to any other   HB3554- 3 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1person, other than a person licensed under this Act, any 2system of collection, letters, demand forms, or other printed 3matter where the name of any person, other than that of the 4creditor, appears in such a manner as to indicate, directly or 5indirectly, that a request or demand is being made by any 6person other than the creditor for the payment of the sum or 7sums due or asserted to be due; (4) engages in the business of 8buying debt; (5) engages in the business of using a fictitious 9name in collecting its own accounts, bills, or debts with the 10intention of conveying to the debtor that a third party has 11been employed to make such collection; or (6) engages in the 12business of collection of a check or other payment that is 13returned unpaid by the financial institution upon which it is 14drawn on behalf of himself or herself or others, engages in the 15collection of a debt. 16    "Consumer debt" or "consumer credit" means money or 17property, or their equivalent, due or owing or alleged to be 18due or owing from a natural person by reason of a consumer 19credit transaction. 20    "Credit transaction" means a transaction between a natural 21person and another person in which property, service, or money 22is acquired on credit by that natural person from such other 23person primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.24    "Creditor" means a person who extends consumer credit to a 25debtor.26    "Current balance" means the charge-off balance plus any   HB3554- 4 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1legally collectible costs, expenses, and interest, less any 2credits or payments. 3    "Debt" means money, property, or their equivalent which is 4due or owing or alleged to be due or owing from a person to 5another person.6    "Debt buyer" means a person or entity that is engaged in 7the business of purchasing delinquent or charged-off consumer 8loans or consumer credit accounts or other delinquent consumer 9debt for collection purposes, whether it collects the debt 10itself or hires a third party to collect third-party for 11collection or hires an attorney-at-law for litigation in order 12to collect such debt. 13    "Debtor" means a person from whom a collection agency 14seeks to collect a consumer or commercial debt that is due and 15owing or alleged to be due and owing from such person.16    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 17Professional Regulation.18    "Email address of record" means the designated email 19address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 20application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 21by the Department Department's licensure maintenance unit. 22    "Person" means a natural person, partnership, corporation, 23limited liability company, trust, estate, cooperative, 24association, or other similar entity.25    "Licensed collection agency" means a person who is 26licensed under this Act to act as a collection agency to engage   HB3554- 5 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1in the practice of debt collection in Illinois.2    "Multi-state licensing system" means a web-based platform 3that allows licensure applicants to submit their applications 4and renewals to the Department online. 5    "Person" means a natural person, partnership, corporation, 6limited liability company, trust, estate, cooperative, 7association, or other similar entity. 8    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 9Professional Regulation or the Secretary's his or her 10designee. 11(Source: P.A. 102-975, eff. 1-1-23.) 12    (205 ILCS 740/2.03)  (was 225 ILCS 425/2.03)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)14    Sec. 2.03. Exemptions. This Act does not apply to persons 15whose collection activities are confined to and are directly 16related to the operation of a business other than that of a 17collection agency, and specifically does not include the 18following:19        1. Banks, including trust departments, affiliates, and 20    subsidiaries thereof, and fiduciaries, and financing and 21    lending institutions (except those who own or operate 22    collection agencies);23        2. Abstract companies doing an escrow business;24        3. Real estate brokers when acting in the pursuit of 25    their profession;  HB3554- 6 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1        4. Public officers and judicial officers acting under 2    order of a court;3        5. Licensed attorneys at law;4        6. Insurance companies;5        7. Credit unions, including affiliates and 6    subsidiaries thereof (except those who own or operate 7    collection agencies);8        8. Persons Loan and finance companies, including 9    entities licensed pursuant to the Residential Mortgage 10    License Act of 1987 when engaged in activity authorized 11    under that Act;12        9. Retail sellers stores collecting on retail 13    installment contracts or retail charge agreements 14    originated by the retail seller their own accounts;15        10. Unit Owner's Associations established under the 16    Condominium Property Act, and their duly authorized 17    agents, when collecting assessments from unit owners; and18        11. Any person or business under contract with a 19    creditor to notify the creditor's debtors of a debt using 20    only the creditor's name. ; 21        12. Persons licensed pursuant to the Sales Finance 22    Agency Act when engaged in collection of accounts 23    purchased or loans made pursuant to that Act;24        13. Persons licensed pursuant to the Student Loan 25    Servicing Act when engaged in activity authorized under 26    that Act;  HB3554- 7 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1        14. Persons licensed pursuant to the Consumer 2    Installment Loan Act when engaged in collection of loans 3    that were originated under that Act;4        15. Persons engaged in the business of originating 5    loans of money pursuant to the Interest Act when engaged 6    in collecting loans that originated under that Act;7        16. Motor vehicle retail sellers collecting motor 8    vehicle retail installment contracts originated by the 9    motor vehicle retail seller;10        17. Any person licensed pursuant to the Consumer Legal 11    Funding Act when engaged in activity authorized by that 12    Act; 13        18. Any person licensed pursuant to the Pawnbroker 14    Regulation Act of 2023 when engaged in activity authorized 15    by that Act; and 16        19. Any person identified by the Department by rule. 17(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.) 18    (205 ILCS 740/2.04)  (was 225 ILCS 425/2.04)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 2.04. Child support debt. 21    (a) Collection agencies engaged in the business of 22collecting child support debt owing under a court order as 23provided under the Illinois Public Aid Code, the Illinois 24Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, the Non-Support 25Punishment Act, the Illinois Parentage Act of 1984, the   HB3554- 8 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, or similar laws of other 2states are not restricted (i) in the frequency of contact with 3an obligor who is in arrears, whether by phone, mail, or other 4means, (ii) from contacting the employer of an obligor who is 5in arrears, (iii) from publishing or threatening to publish a 6list of obligors in arrears, (iv) from disclosing or 7threatening to disclose an arrearage that the obligor 8disputes, but for which a verified notice of delinquency has 9been served under the Income Withholding for Support Act (or 10any of its predecessors, Section 10-16.2 of the Illinois 11Public Aid Code, Section 706.1 of the Illinois Marriage and 12Dissolution of Marriage Act, Section 22 of the Non-Support 13Punishment Act, Section 26.1 of the Revised Uniform Reciprocal 14Enforcement of Support Act, or Section 20 of the Illinois 15Parentage Act of 1984), or (v) from engaging in conduct that 16would not cause a reasonable person mental or physical 17illness. For purposes of this subsection, "obligor" means an 18individual who owes a duty to make periodic payments, under a 19court order, for the support of a child. "Arrearage" means the 20total amount of an obligor's unpaid child support obligations.21    (a-5) A collection agency may not impose a fee or charge, 22including costs, for any child support payments collected 23through the efforts of a federal, State, or local government 24agency, including but not limited to child support collected 25from federal or State tax refunds, unemployment benefits, or 26Social Security benefits.  HB3554- 9 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    No collection agency that collects child support payments 2shall (i) impose a charge or fee, including costs, for 3collection of a current child support payment, (ii) fail to 4apply collections to current support as specified in the order 5for support before applying collection to arrears or other 6amounts, or (iii) designate a current child support payment as 7arrears or other amount owed. In all circumstances, the 8collection agency shall turn over to the obligee all support 9collected in a month up to the amount of current support 10required to be paid for that month.11    As to any fees or charges, including costs, retained by 12the collection agency, that agency shall provide documentation 13to the obligee demonstrating that the child support payments 14resulted from the actions of the agency.15    After collection of the total amount or arrearage, 16including statutory interest, due as of the date of execution 17of the collection contract, no further fees may be charged.18    (a-10) A The Department shall determine a fee rate of not 19less than 25% but not greater than 35%, based upon 20presentation by the licensees as to costs to provide the 21service and a fair rate of return. This rate shall be 22established by administrative rule. Without prejudice to the 23determination by the Department of the appropriate rate 24through administrative rule, a collection agency shall impose 25a fee of not more than 29% of the amount of child support 26actually collected by the collection agency subject to the   HB3554- 10 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1provisions of subsection (a-5). This rate may be modified by 2rule to a fee rate of not less than 25% but not greater than 335% This interim rate is based upon the March 2002 General 4Account Office report "Child Support Enforcement", GAO-02-349. 5This rate shall apply until a fee rate is established by 6administrative rule. 7    (b) The Department shall adopt rules necessary to 8administer and enforce the provisions of this Section.9(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-642, 10eff. 7-28-16.) 11    (205 ILCS 740/4)  (was 225 ILCS 425/4)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 4. No collection agency shall operate in this State, 14directly or indirectly engage in the business of collecting 15debt, solicit debt claims for others, have a sales office, a 16client, or solicit a client in this State, exercise the right 17to collect, or receive payment for another of any debt, 18without obtaining a license under this Act. Notwithstanding 19any other provision of this Section, except that no collection 20agency shall be required to be licensed if the agency's 21activities in this State are limited to collecting debts from 22debtors located in this State by means of interstate 23communication, including telephone, mail, or facsimile 24transmission, electronic mail, or any other Internet 25communication from the agency's location in another state   HB3554- 11 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1provided they are licensed in that state and these same 2privileges are permitted in that licensed state to agencies 3licensed in Illinois.4(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.) 5    (205 ILCS 740/4.5)  (was 225 ILCS 425/4.5)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)7    Sec. 4.5. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil penalty. 8    (a) Any person who practices, offers to practice, attempts 9to practice, or holds oneself out to practice as a collection 10agency without being licensed under this Act shall, in 11addition to any other penalty provided by law, pay a civil 12penalty to the Department in an amount not to exceed $10,000 13for each offense as determined by the Department. The civil 14penalty shall be assessed by the Department after an 15opportunity for a hearing a hearing is held in accordance with 16the provisions set forth in this Act regarding the provision 17of a hearing for the discipline of a licensee.18    (b) The Department has the authority and power to 19investigate any and all unlicensed activity. In addition to 20taking any other action provided under this Act, whenever the 21Department has reason to believe a person has violated any 22provision of subsection (a) of this Section, the Department 23may issue a rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist 24should not be entered against that person. The rule shall 25clearly set forth the grounds relied upon by the Department   HB3554- 12 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1and shall provide a period of 7 days from the date of the rule 2to file an answer to the satisfaction of the Department. 3Failure to answer to the satisfaction of the Department shall 4provide the Department authority to issue an order to cease 5and desist immediately. 6    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 30 60 days after 7the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 8The order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 9executed in the same manner as any judgment from any court of 10record.11    (d) All moneys collected under this Section shall be 12deposited into the Financial Institution Fund. 13(Source: P.A. 102-205, eff. 7-30-21; 102-975, eff. 1-1-23.) 14    (205 ILCS 740/9)  (was 225 ILCS 425/9)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 9. Disciplinary actions. 17    (a) The Department may refuse to issue or renew, or may 18revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other 19disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department may 20deem proper, including fines not to exceed $10,000 per 21violation, for any one or any combination of the following 22causes:23        (1) Material misstatement in furnishing information to 24    the Department. 25        (2) Violations of this Act or of the rules promulgated   HB3554- 13 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    hereunder.2        (3) Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 3    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 4    sentencing of any crime, including, but not limited to, 5    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 6    conditional discharge, or first offender probation of the 7    collection agency or any of the officers or owners of more 8    than 10% interest of the agency of any crime under the laws 9    of any U.S. jurisdiction that (i) is a felony, (ii) is a 10    misdemeanor, an essential element of which is dishonesty, 11    or (iii) is directly related to the practice of a 12    collection agency.13        (4) Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for, or 14    procuring, a license under this Act or in connection with 15    applying for renewal of a license under this Act.16        (5) Aiding or assisting another person in violating 17    any provision of this Act or rules adopted under this Act.18        (6) Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 19    response to a written request made by the Department. 20        (7) Habitual or excessive use or addiction to alcohol, 21    narcotics, stimulants or any other chemical agent or drug 22    which results in the inability to practice with reasonable 23    judgment, skill, or safety by any of the officers or 24    owners of 10% or more interest of a collection agency.25        (8) Discipline by another agency of this State, 26    another state, the District of Columbia, a territory of   HB3554- 14 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    the United States, or a foreign nation, if at least one of 2    the grounds for the discipline is the same or 3    substantially equivalent to those set forth in this Act.4        (9) A finding by the Department that the licensee, 5    after having his or her license placed on probationary 6    status, has violated the terms of probation.7        (10) Willfully making or filing false records or 8    reports in his or her practice, including, but not limited 9    to, false records filed with State agencies or 10    departments. 11        (11) Practicing or attempting to practice under a 12    false or, except as provided by law, an assumed name.13        (12) An adjudicated finding by the Federal Trade 14    Commission or other federal or State agency that a 15    licensee violated the federal Fair Debt Collection 16    Practices Act or its rules.17        (13) Failure to file a return, or to pay the tax, 18    penalty or interest shown in a filed return, or to pay any 19    final assessment of tax, penalty or interest, as required 20    by any tax Act administered by the Illinois Department of 21    Revenue until such time as the requirements of any such 22    tax Act are satisfied.23        (14) Using or threatening to use force or violence to 24    cause physical harm to a debtor, his or her family or his 25    or her property.26        (15) Threatening to instigate an arrest or criminal   HB3554- 15 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    prosecution where no basis for a criminal complaint 2    lawfully exists.3        (16) Threatening the seizure, attachment or sale of a 4    debtor's property where such action can only be taken 5    pursuant to court order without disclosing that prior 6    court proceedings are required.7        (17) Disclosing or threatening to disclose information 8    adversely affecting a debtor's reputation for credit 9    worthiness with knowledge the information is false.10        (18) Threatening to initiate communication with a 11    debtor's employer unless there has been a default of the 12    payment of the obligation for at least 30 days and the 13    licensee has given at least 5 days prior written notice of 14    the intention to communicate with the employer to the 15    employee to the last known address of the debtor.16         (19) Communicating with the debtor or any member of 17    the debtor's family at such a time of day or night and with 18    such frequency as to constitute harassment of the debtor 19    or any member of the debtor's family. For purposes of this 20    Section the following conduct shall constitute harassment:21            (A) Communicating with the debtor or any member of 22        his or her family in connection with the collection of 23        any debt without the prior consent of the debtor given 24        directly to the debt collector, or the express 25        permission of a court of competent jurisdiction, at 26        any unusual time or place or a time or place known or   HB3554- 16 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1        which should be known to be inconvenient to the 2        debtor. In the absence of knowledge of circumstances 3        to the contrary, a debt collector shall assume that 4        the convenient time for communicating with a consumer 5        is after 8 o'clock a.m. and before 9 o'clock p.m. in 6        the debtor's local time.7            (B) The threat of publication or publication of a 8        list of consumers who allegedly refuse to pay debts, 9        except to a consumer reporting agency.10            (C) The threat of advertisement or advertisement 11        for sale of any debt to coerce payment of the debt.12            (D) Causing a telephone to ring or engaging any 13        person in telephone conversation repeatedly or 14        continuously with intent to annoy, abuse, or harass 15        any person at the called number.16        (20) Using profane, obscene, or abusive language in 17    communicating with a debtor, his or her family, or others.18        (21) Disclosing or threatening to disclose information 19    relating to a debtor's debt to any other person except 20    where such other person has a legitimate business need for 21    the information or except where such disclosure is 22    permitted by law.23        (22) Disclosing or threatening to disclose information 24    concerning the existence of a debt which the collection 25    agency knows to be disputed by the debtor without 26    disclosing the fact that the debtor disputes the debt.  HB3554- 17 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1        (23) Engaging in any conduct that is intended to cause 2    and did cause mental or physical illness to the debtor or 3    his or her family.4        (24) Attempting or threatening to enforce a right or 5    remedy with knowledge or reason to know that the right or 6    remedy does not exist.7        (25) Failing to disclose to the debtor or his or her 8    family the legally authorized corporate, partnership or 9    proprietary name, or other trade or business name, under 10    which the collection agency is engaging in debt 11    collections.12        (26) Using any form of communication which simulates 13    legal or judicial process or which gives the appearance of 14    being authorized, issued, or approved by a governmental 15    agency or official or by an attorney at law when it is not.16        (27) Using any badge, uniform, or other indicia of any 17    governmental agency or official except as authorized by 18    law.19        (28) Conducting business under any name or in any 20    manner which suggests or implies that the collection 21    agency is a branch of or is affiliated in any way with a 22    governmental agency or court if such collection agency is 23    not.24        (29) Failing to disclose, at the time of making any 25    demand for payment, the name of the person to whom the debt 26    is owed and at the request of the debtor, the address where   HB3554- 18 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    payment is to be made and the address of the person to whom 2    the debt is owed.3        (30) Misrepresenting the amount of the debt alleged to 4    be owed.5        (31) Representing that an existing debt may be 6    increased by the addition of attorney's fees, 7    investigation fees or any other fees or charges when such 8    fees or charges may not legally be added to the existing 9    debt.10        (32) Falsely representing Representing that the 11    collection agency is an attorney at law or an agent for an 12    attorney if he or she is not.13        (33) Collecting or attempting to collect any interest 14    or other charge or fee in excess of the actual debt unless 15    such interest or other charge or fee is expressly 16    authorized by the agreement creating the debt unless 17    expressly authorized by law or unless in a commercial 18    transaction such interest or other charge or fee is 19    expressly authorized in a subsequent agreement. If a 20    contingency or hourly fee arrangement (i) is established 21    under an agreement between a collection agency and a 22    creditor to collect a debt and (ii) is paid by a debtor 23    pursuant to a contract between the debtor and the 24    creditor, then that fee arrangement does not violate this 25    Section unless the fee is unreasonable. The Department 26    shall determine what constitutes a reasonable collection   HB3554- 19 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    fee. 2        (34) Communicating or threatening to communicate with 3    a debtor when the collection agency is informed in writing 4    by an attorney that the attorney represents the debtor 5    concerning the debt. If the attorney fails to respond 6    within a reasonable period of time, the collector may 7    communicate with the debtor. The collector may communicate 8    with the debtor when the debtor's attorney gives his or 9    her consent.10        (35) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 11    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 12    defraud, or harm the public.13    (b) No collection agency while collecting or attempting to 14collect a debt shall engage in any of the Acts specified in 15this Section, each of which shall be unlawful practice.16(Source: P.A. 102-975, eff. 1-1-23.) 17    (205 ILCS 740/9.1)  (was 225 ILCS 425/9.1)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 9.1. Communication with persons other than debtor. 20Any collection agency communicating with any person other than 21the debtor for the purpose of acquiring location information 22about the debtor shall:23        (1) identify himself or herself, state that he or she 24    is confirming or correcting location information 25    concerning the consumer, and, only if expressly requested,   HB3554- 20 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    identify his or her employer;2        (2) not state that the consumer owes any debt;3        (3) not communicate with any person more than once 4    unless requested to do so by the person or unless the 5    collection agency reasonably believes that the earlier 6    response of the person is erroneous or incomplete and that 7    the person now has correct or complete location 8    information;9        (4) not communicate by postcard;10        (5) not use any language or symbol on any envelope or 11    in the contents of any communication effected by mail or 12    telegram that indicates that the collection agency is in 13    the debt collection business or that the communication 14    relates to the collection of a debt; and15        (6) not communicate with any person other than the 16    debtor's attorney after the collection agency knows the 17    debtor is represented by an attorney with regard to the 18    subject debt and has knowledge of or can readily ascertain 19    the attorney's name and address, unless the attorney fails 20    to respond within a reasonable period of time, not less 21    than 30 days, to communication from the collection agency.22    This Section applies to a collection agency or debt buyer 23only when engaged in the collection of consumer debt. 24(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-500, eff. 1-29-16.) 25    (205 ILCS 740/13.2)  (was 225 ILCS 425/13.2)  HB3554- 21 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)2    Sec. 13.2. Powers and duties of Department. The Department 3shall exercise the powers and duties prescribed by the 4Financial Institutions Act for the administration of licensing 5Acts and shall exercise such other powers and duties necessary 6for effectuating the purposes of this Act.7    Subject to the provisions of this Act, the Department may: 8        (1) Conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to issue 9    or renew or to revoke licenses or suspend, place on 10    probation, or reprimand persons licensed under this Act.11        (2) To adopt rules consistent with the purposes of 12    this Act, including, but not limited to: (i) rules in 13    connection with the activities of collection agencies as 14    may be necessary and appropriate for the protection of 15    consumers in this State; (ii) rules as may be necessary 16    and appropriate to define and enforce against improper or 17    fraudulent business practices in connection with the 18    activities of collection agencies; (iii) rules that define 19    the terms used in this Act and as may be necessary and 20    appropriate to interpret and implement the provisions of 21    this Act; and (iv) rules as may be necessary for the 22    enforcement of this Act. 23        (3) Obtain written recommendations from the Board 24    regarding standards of professional conduct, formal 25    disciplinary actions and the formulation of rules 26    affecting these matters. Notice of proposed rulemaking   HB3554- 22 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    shall be transmitted to the Board and the Department shall 2    review the response of the Board and any recommendations 3    made in the response. The Department may solicit the 4    advice of the Board on any matter relating to the 5    administration and enforcement of this Act.6        (4) (Blank). 7(Source: P.A. 102-975, eff. 1-1-23; 103-1014, eff. 8-9-24.) 8    (205 ILCS 740/14b)  (was 225 ILCS 425/14b)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)10    Sec. 14b. Penalty of unlawful practice; second and 11subsequent offenses. Any person entity that practices or 12offers to practice as a collection agency in this State 13without being licensed for that purpose, or whose license is 14suspended, revoked, or expired, or that violates any of the 15provisions of this Act for which no specific penalty has been 16provided herein, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.17    Any person entity that has been previously convicted under 18any of the provisions of this Act and that subsequently 19violates any of the provisions of this Act is guilty of a Class 204 felony. In addition, whenever any person entity is punished 21as a subsequent offender under this Section, the Secretary 22shall proceed to obtain a permanent injunction against that 23person such entity under Section 14a of this Act.24(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.)   HB3554- 23 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    (205 ILCS 740/16)  (was 225 ILCS 425/16)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 16. Investigation; notice and hearing. The Department 4may investigate and conduct periodic examinations of the 5actions or qualifications of any applicant or of any person 6rendering or offering to render collection agency services or 7any person holding or claiming to hold a license as a 8collection agency. The Department shall, before refusing to 9issue or renew, revoking, suspending, placing on probation, 10reprimanding, or taking any other disciplinary action under 11Section 9 of this Act, serve notice on any person, including a 12statement of the reasons for the Department's action, and 13notify the person that they may file a Petition for a Hearing 14with the Department within 30 days of service. All hearings 15shall be conducted in accordance with 38 Ill. Adm. Code 100. At 16the discretion of the Secretary, after having first received 17the recommendation of the Board, the accused person's license 18may be suspended or revoked, if the evidence constitutes 19sufficient grounds for such action under this Act. Written or 20electronic notice may be served by personal delivery, mail, or 21email to the applicant or licensee at the address of record or 22email address of record. Service by mail is completed when the 23notice is deposited in the U.S. Mail. Service to the email 24address of record is completed when the email is sent.25(Source: P.A. 102-975, eff. 1-1-23.)   HB3554- 24 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    (205 ILCS 740/17)  (was 225 ILCS 425/17)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 17. Record of hearing; transcript. The Department, at 4its expense, shall preserve a record of all proceedings at the 5formal hearing of any case. The notice of hearing, complaint, 6all other documents in the nature of pleadings, written 7motions filed in the proceedings, the transcript of testimony, 8the report of the Board, and orders of the Department shall be 9in the record of the proceedings.10(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15; 100-132, eff. 8-18-17.) 11    (205 ILCS 740/18)  (was 225 ILCS 425/18)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 18. Subpoenas; oaths; attendance of witnesses. 14    (a) The Department has the power to subpoena documents, 15books, records, or other materials and to bring before it any 16person and to take testimony either orally or by deposition, 17or both, with the same fees and mileage and in the same manner 18as prescribed in civil cases in the courts of this State.19    (b) The Secretary, and the designated hearing officer have 20, and every member of the Board has power to administer oaths 21to witnesses at any hearing that the Department is authorized 22to conduct and any other oaths authorized in any Act 23administered by the Department.24    (c) Any circuit court may, upon application of the 25Department or designee or of the applicant or licensee against   HB3554- 25 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1whom proceedings under this Act are pending, enter an order 2requiring the attendance of witnesses and their testimony, and 3the production of documents, papers, files, books, and records 4in connection with any hearing or investigations. The court 5may compel obedience to its order by proceedings for contempt.6(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.) 7    (205 ILCS 740/19)  (was 225 ILCS 425/19)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 19. Findings and recommendations. At the conclusion 10of the hearing, the hearing officer Board shall present to the 11Secretary a written report of its findings of fact, 12conclusions of law, and recommendations. The report shall 13contain a finding whether or not the accused person violated 14this Act or the rules adopted under this Act or failed to 15comply with the conditions required in this Act or those 16rules. The hearing officer Board shall specify the nature of 17the violation or failure to comply and shall make its 18recommendations to the Secretary.19    The report of findings of fact and , conclusions of law, 20and recommendation of the Board shall be the basis for the 21Department's order for refusing to issue, restore, or renew a 22license, or otherwise disciplining a licensee, or for the 23granting of a license. If the Secretary disagrees with the 24report, findings of fact, and conclusions of law, and 25recommendations of the Board, the Secretary may issue an order   HB3554- 26 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1in contravention of the hearing officer's Board's 2recommendations. The finding is not admissible in evidence 3against the person in a criminal prosecution brought for the 4violation of this Act, but the hearing and finding are not a 5bar to a criminal prosecution brought for the violation of 6this Act.7(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.) 8    (205 ILCS 740/20)  (was 225 ILCS 425/20)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)10    Sec. 20. Rehearing Board; rehearing. At the conclusion of 11the hearing, a copy of the hearing officer's Board's report 12shall be served upon the applicant or licensee by the 13Department, either personally or as provided in this Act for 14the service of the notice of hearing. Within 20 calendar days 15after the service, the applicant or licensee may present to 16the Department a motion in writing for a rehearing which shall 17specify the particular grounds for rehearing. The Department 18may respond to the motion for rehearing within 20 days after 19its service on the Department, and the applicant or licensee 20may reply within 7 days thereafter. If no motion for rehearing 21is filed, then upon the expiration of the time specified for 22filing a motion, or if a motion for rehearing is denied, then 23upon denial, the Secretary may enter an order in accordance 24with the recommendations of the hearing officer Board, except 25as provided for in Section 19. If the applicant or licensee   HB3554- 27 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1orders a transcript of the record from the reporting service 2and pays for it within the time for filing a motion for 3rehearing, the 20 day period within which a motion for 4rehearing may be filed shall commence upon the delivery of the 5transcript to the applicant or licensee.6(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.) 7    (205 ILCS 740/22)  (was 225 ILCS 425/22)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 22. Appointment of a hearing officer. The Secretary 10has the authority to appoint any attorney duly licensed to 11practice law in the State of Illinois to serve as the hearing 12officer in any action for refusal to issue, restore, or renew a 13license or to discipline a licensee. The hearing officer shall 14have full authority to conduct the hearing. A Board member or 15members may, but are not required to, attend hearings. The 16hearing officer shall report his or her findings of fact, 17conclusions of law, and recommendations to the Board. The 18Board shall review the report of the hearing officer and 19present its findings of fact, conclusions of law, and 20recommendations to the Secretary and to all parties to the 21proceeding. If the Secretary disagrees with the recommendation 22of the Board or of the hearing officer, the Secretary may issue 23an order in contravention of the recommendation.24(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.)   HB3554- 28 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b1    (205 ILCS 740/23)  (was 225 ILCS 425/23)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 23. Order or certified copy; prima facie proof. An 4order or a certified copy thereof, over the seal of the 5Department and purporting to be signed by the Secretary, shall 6be prima facie proof that:7        (1) the signature is the genuine signature of the 8    Secretary; and 9        (2) the Secretary is duly appointed and qualified. ; 10    and 11        (3) the Board and its members are qualified to act.12(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.) 13    (205 ILCS 740/35)  (was 225 ILCS 425/35)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)15    Sec. 35. Returned checks; fines. Any person who delivers a 16check or other payment to the Department that is returned to 17the Department unpaid by the financial institution upon which 18it is drawn shall pay to the Department, in addition to the 19amount already owed to the Department, a fine of $50. The fines 20imposed by this Section are in addition to any other 21discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed practice or 22practice on a non-renewed license. The Department shall notify 23the person entity that payment of fees and fines shall be paid 24to the Department by certified check or money order within 30 25calendar days of the notification. If, after the expiration of   HB3554- 29 -LRB104 12039 BAB 22134 b130 days from the date of notification, the person has failed to 2submit the necessary remittance, the Department shall 3automatically terminate the license or deny the application, 4without hearing. If, after the termination or denial, the 5person entity seeks a license, it shall apply to the 6Department for restoration or issuance of the license and pay 7all fees and fines due to the Department. The Department may 8establish a fee for the processing of an application for 9restoration of a license to pay all expenses of processing 10this application. The Secretary may waive the fines due under 11this Section in individual cases where the Secretary finds 12that the fines would be unreasonable or unnecessarily 13burdensome.14(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.) 15    (205 ILCS 740/3 rep.)16    (205 ILCS 740/13.1 rep.)17    Section 15. The Collection Agency Act is amended by 18repealing Sections 3 and 13.1.